Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1107
Dental assistant, defined.

Dental assistant means a person who does not hold a license under the Dentistry Practice Act and who is employed for the purpose of assisting a licensed dentist in the performance of his or her clinical and clinical-related duties as described in section 38-1135.

Laws 1986, LB 267, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 800, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-183.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 440;

Laws 2017, LB18, § 4.